Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-901 to 71-964 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 89;

Laws 1988, LB 257, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 498, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 116;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1078;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB512, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 103.